New Jersey, session 222, S3668.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person or entity that deploys an artificial intelligence system to communicate with a consumer through an online platform shall, upon establishing contact with the consumer and prior to initiating any further communication, clearly and conspicuously: (1)   notify the consumer that an artificial intelligence system is communicating with the consumer; and (2)   provide the consumer with information on how to contact a human, including but not limited to providing a phone number, Internet website, or similar contact information for a human; the days and times a human is available; and any other information necessary for communication with a human. b.    It shall be an unlawful practice and a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.) for any person or entity that deploys an artificial intelligence system to communicate with a consumer through an online platform to violate the provisions of this section. c.     As used in this section: Artificial intelligence means the development of software and hardware and the end-use application of technologies that are able to perform tasks normally requiring human intelligence, including, but not limited to, visual perception, speech recognition, decision-making, translation between languages, and generative artificial intelligence, which generates new content in response to user inputs of data. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.